Utah statutes.
41-6a-1617.   Highway construction and maintenance vehicles -- Transportation department to adopt rules for lighting.

(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the Department of Transportation shall make rules providing specifications governing the design and use of special flashing lights on vehicles engaged in highway construction or maintenance operations.

(2)  The standards and specifications adopted under Subsection (1) shall correlate with, and where possible conform to, the standards set forth in the most recent edition of the "Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and Highways" and other standards issued or endorsed by the federal highway administrator.

(3)  The operator of a vehicle engaged in highway construction or maintenance operations shall comply with rules adopted under this section.

